Utah statutes.
17D-2-501.   Provisions applicable to issuance of local building authority bonds.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter:

(1)  each local building authority that issues bonds shall:

(a)  issue them as provided in Title 11, Chapter 14, Local Government Bonding Act, except Section 11-14-306; and

(b)  receive the benefits of Title 11, Chapter 30, Utah Bond Validation Act;

(2)  bonds issued by a local building authority are governed by and subject to Title 11, Chapter 14, Local Government Bonding Act, except Sections 11-14-306 and 11-14-403; and

(3)  each local building authority that issues refunding bonds shall issue them as provided in Title 11, Chapter 27, Utah Refunding Bond Act.



Enacted by Chapter 360, 2008 General Session

